Maine, session 132, LD1032.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§15, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 380, Pt. TT, §1, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
The State Court Administrator shall contract for the services of qualified individuals to
perform court security-related functions and services at a court if court operations at
that court have been adversely affected by a lack of available court security for more
than 2% of scheduled court time in a month at that court.
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §17, sub-§15, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 380, Pt. TT, §1, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
When the State Court Administrator contracts for the services of qualified individuals
to perform court security-related functions and services, the State Court Administrator
shall first offer the contract to the appropriate sheriff's office before the contract is
offered to another party.